Rhode Island, session 2025, SB403.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 21 of the General Laws entitled "FOOD AND DRUGS" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 13.1
FORCE-FED POULTRY PRODUCTS
21-13.1-1. Legislative intent.
The general assembly recognizes it is in the public interest to protect the public health and
general welfare of the State of Rhode Island by regulating industries, such as foie gras, that are
inhumane, environmentally unsustainable, and increase the risk of zoonotic diseases.
21-13.1-2. Definitions.
For the purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meaning:
(1) “Force-fed poultry product” means any product that is the result of force-feeding a bird,
including, but not limited to, a duck or a goose, with the intent to fatten or enlarge the bird's liver.
(2) “Force-feeding” means the practice of forcing, by any means, food or supplements into
the throat, esophagus, crop or stomach of an animal.
(3) “Sell” means any act of selling, trading, or bartering for monetary or nonmonetary
consideration, and includes any transfer of ownership that occurs in the course of a commercial
transaction.
21-13.1-3. Prohibited conduct.
(a) A person shall not engage in force-feeding to create a force-fed poultry product nor hire

another to engage in force-feeding to create a force-fed poultry product.
(b) A person shall not sell in Rhode Island by any means, including, but not limited to,
direct, telephone, electronic or Internet sales, any force-fed poultry product or food containing a
force-fed poultry product. For purposes of this chapter, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that
an item that is in any way identified or labeled as "foie gras", or listed on a menu as "foie gras", is
a force-fed poultry product. Any party seeking to rebut such presumption shall provide
documentary evidence proving that the product they are storing, keeping, maintaining, offering for
sale, or selling is not a force-fed poultry product as defined in this chapter.
21-13.1-4. Enforcement.
(a) Any person who is found to violate any provision of this chapter shall be subject to a
civil penalty of five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation. Each such violation may be treated
as a separate and distinct offense, and in the case of a continuing violation, each day's continuance
thereof may be treated as a separate and distinct offense.
(b) Any person who violates any provision of this chapter may be prosecuted by the city
or town where the violation occurs, or by the state department of health, and the municipality or
department of health, after deducting the costs of trial and conviction, may retain the balance of the
fine or fines recovered for the use of the municipality or department.
(c) A peace officer, officer of an animal control or animal regulation department of a public
agency, may issue a citation to a person who violates this chapter.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
========
LC000197
========
LC000197 - Page 2 of 3